Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,165
Violations; conference; requirements.

If the Director of Insurance or the Department of Health and Human Services has for any reason cause to believe that any violation of the Health Maintenance Organization Act has occurred or is threatened, the Director of Insurance or the Department of Health and Human Services may give notice to the health maintenance organization and to the representatives or other persons who appear to be involved in such suspected violation to arrange a conference with the alleged violators or their authorized representatives for the purpose of attempting to ascertain the facts relating to such suspected violation and, if it appears that any violation has occurred or is threatened, to arrive at an adequate and effective means of correcting or preventing such violation. Proceedings under this section shall not be governed by any formal procedural requirements and may be conducted in such manner as the Director of Insurance or the Department of Health and Human Services deems appropriate under the circumstances. Unless consented to by the health maintenance organization, no rule or order may result from a conference until the requirements of this section are satisfied.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 74;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 256;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 195.